Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1103.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Instructional materials." Textbooks and supplementary materials used as part of required classroom instruction."Public school entity." A public school, including a school district, charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school."Voluntary inquiry materials." Nonfiction and fiction books, magazines, reference books, supplementary titles, multimedia and digital materials, software and instructional materials and other materials not required as part of classroom instruction.12345678910111213141516171819 Section 2. State aid requirement for libraries relating to book removal.(a) Requirement.--To receive State aid, a library subject to 24 Pa.C.S. Ch. 93 (relating to Public Library Code) or a school library must:(1) adopt the American Library Association's Library Bill of Rights that indicates materials should not be proscribed or removed because of partisan or doctrinal disapproval; or(2) develop a written statement that prohibits the library from banning books or other materials.(b) Prohibition.--A municipality may not reduce funding for a library due to the library's compliance with subsection (a).Section 3. Prohibited removal of instructional materials and voluntary inquiry materials in public school entities.Instructional materials and voluntary inquiry materials shall not be removed from a library or classroom in a public school entity due to any of the following reasons:(1) Partisan approval or disapproval.(2) The author's race, nationality, gender identity, sexual orientation or political or religious views.(3) School board of directors' or complainants' discomfort, personal morality or political or religious views.(4) The author's points of view concerning the problems and issues of our time, whether international, national or local.(5) The race, nationality, gender identity, sexual orientation or political or religious views of the 20250SB1103PN1338 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 protagonist or other characters.(6) Content that is relevant to the research, independent reading interests and educational needs of older students based on their age, development or grade level.(7) Content related to sexual health that addresses physical, mental, emotional and social dimensions of human sexuality, including puberty, sex and relationships.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1103PN1338 - 3 - 123456789